Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 270 of Title 56, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “universal basic income” means any


program that provides a recurring source of income in the form of a


government transfer payment to all residents within a designated


area or political subdivision of this state without a means test or


work requirement.


B. No universal basic income shall be provided by this state or


any political subdivision of this state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3541 BRC 1/14/2026 9:57:13 PM



Req. No. 3541 Page 1